Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-587
Audit; information made available.

The audit and report shall be made at the close of the fiscal year. The person making the examination and audit shall have access to all books, records, vouchers, papers, contracts or other data containing information on said subject (1) in the office of the reclamation district, (2) in the office of the general manager of the district, or (3) in the possession or under the control of any of the officers, agents or servants of the district. It is hereby made the duty of all officers, agents and servants of the reclamation district to furnish to the Auditor of Public Accounts, his agents, servants and employees, such information regarding the auditing of such reclamation districts as may be demanded.

Laws 1965, c. 269, § 3, p. 770.